Tennessee statutes. Title 45 Banks And Financial Institutions
Part 2 Pawnbrokers Act of 1988
45-6-220. Existing licensees — Renewals.

Notwithstanding any provision of this part to the contrary, the license of any person, firm, or corporation licensed as a pawnbroker on July 1, 1988, shall continue in force until the natural expiration thereof, and all other provisions of this part shall apply to the licensee.

The pawnbroker shall be eligible for renewal of the license upon its expiration or the expiration of subsequent renewals; provided, that the licensee complies with the requirements for renewal that were in effect immediately prior to July 1, 1988.

Acts 1988, ch. 724, § 20.

45-6-221. Electronic information transfer.

Each licensed pawnbroker shall have a computer system in operation, if so requested by the appropriate law enforcement agency, that is capable of electronically transferring information, and shall electronically transfer the information in text file format on pledged goods to the appropriate law enforcement agency where the pawnshop is located. A pawnbroker who is electronically transferring information on pledged goods to the appropriate law enforcement agency, as of July 1, 2012, shall be deemed in compliance with the requirements set forth in this section.

In the event the pawnbroker transfers pawn transactions electronically, the pawnbroker is not required to also deliver to the appropriate law enforcement official the original or copies of the pawnbroker transaction forms. The appropriate law enforcement official may, for the purposes of a criminal investigation, request that the pawnbroker produce an original of a transaction form that has been electronically transferred. The pawnbroker shall deliver this form to the appropriate law enforcement official within twenty-four (24) hours or the next business day following the request.

Acts 1994, ch. 935, § 2; 1997, ch. 409, § 5; 2012, ch. 778, § 1.

45-6-222. Procedure for subpoena for production of fingerprint.

The following procedure shall be employed when a law enforcement officer, as defined in § 39-11-106, seeks to obtain a subpoena for the production of a thumbprint taken and maintained pursuant to § 45-6-209(b)(7) for the purpose of establishing, investigating or gathering evidence for the prosecution of a criminal offense.

If the officer has reason to believe that a criminal offense has been committed or is being committed and that requiring the production of a thumbprint in the possession of a pawnbroker is necessary to establish who committed or is committing the offense or to aid in the investigation and prosecution of the person or persons believed to have committed or believed to be committing the offense, the officer shall prepare an affidavit in accordance with subsection (c).

An affidavit in support of a request to compel the production of a thumbprint from a pawnbroker shall state with particularity the following:

A statement that a specific criminal offense has been committed or is being committed and the nature of the offense;

The articulable reasons why the law enforcement officer believes the production of the thumbprint requested will materially assist in the investigation of the specific offense committed or being committed;

The name and address of the pawnbroker maintaining the thumbprint; and

The nexus between the thumbprint requested and the criminal offense committed or being committed.

Upon preparing the affidavit, the law enforcement officer shall submit it to a magistrate, as defined in §§ 40-5-101 and 40-5-102. The magistrate shall examine the affidavit and may examine the affiants under oath. The magistrate may grant the request for a subpoena to produce the thumbprint requested if the magistrate finds that the affiants have presented a reasonable basis for believing that:

A specific criminal offense has been committed or is being committed;

Production of the requested thumbprint will materially assist law enforcement in the establishment or investigation of such offense;

There exists a clear and logical nexus between the thumbprint requested and the offense committed or being committed; and

The scope of the request is not unreasonably broad or the thumbprint unduly burdensome to produce.

If the magistrate finds that all of the criteria set out in subdivision (d)(1) do not exist as to the thumbprint requested, the magistrate shall deny the request for subpoena.

The affidavit filed in support of any request for the issuance of a subpoena pursuant to this section shall be filed with and maintained by the magistrate's office. If a subpoena is issued as the result of the affidavit, the affidavit shall be kept under seal by the magistrate until a copy is requested by the district attorney general, criminal charges are filed in the case, or the affidavit is ordered released by a court of record for good cause.

A subpoena granted pursuant to this section by a magistrate of a court of record shall issue to any part of the state and shall command the pawnbroker to whom it is directed to produce any thumbprint that is specified in the subpoena to the law enforcement officer and at a reasonable time and place designated in the subpoena. A subpoena granted pursuant to this section by any other magistrate shall in all respects be like a subpoena granted by the magistrate of a court of record but shall issue only within the county in which the magistrate has jurisdiction. The magistrate shall prepare or cause to be prepared the subpoena and it shall describe the specific thumbprint requested and set forth the date and manner it is to be delivered to the officer.

If the subpoena is issued by a magistrate of a court of record, it may be served by the officer in any county of the state by personal service, certified mail, return receipt requested, or by any other means with the consent of the person named in the subpoena. If the subpoena is issued by any other magistrate it shall be served by an officer with jurisdiction in the county of the issuing magistrate but may be served by personal service, certified mail, return receipt requested, or by any other means with the consent of the person named in the subpoena. The officer shall maintain a copy of the subpoena and endorse thereon the date and manner of service as proof thereof.

No pawnbroker shall be excused from complying with a subpoena for the production of a thumbprint maintained by the pawnbroker issued pursuant to this section on the ground that production of the requested thumbprint may tend to incriminate the pawnbroker. Any pawnbroker claiming a privilege against self incrimination must assert the claim before the magistrate issuing the subpoena promptly and before the time designated for compliance therewith. If the district attorney general thereafter certifies to the magistrate that the interests of justice demand the production of the thumbprint for which the claim of privilege is asserted, then the magistrate shall order the production of the thumbprint and the pawnbroker shall not be prosecuted or subjected to any penalty or forfeiture for or on account of any transaction, matter or thing concerning the requested thumbprint the pawnbroker was compelled to produce.

No subpoena for the production of a thumbprint as authorized by this section shall be directed to, or served upon, any defendant, or defendant's counsel, in a criminal action in this state, any person who is suspected of committing a criminal offense or any person who is the subject of a criminal investigation.

If any pawnbroker, without cause, refuses to produce the requested thumbprint within the time and manner designated for compliance by the issuing magistrate, the district attorney general shall seek a writ of attachment from the issuing magistrate to seize the pawnbroker within the state and that pawnbroker may be held in civil contempt and committed to jail therein to remain without bail until willing to comply with the subpoena as the law directs.

Acts 2001, ch. 429, § 2; 2005, ch. 225, §§ 1-7.

45-6-223. Racial profiling prohibited — Violations — Penalty.

No law enforcement officer or agency shall use any thumb or other print obtained pursuant to § 45-6-222 for the purpose of racial profiling.

Any person residing within the jurisdiction of the law enforcement officer or agency alleged to have violated this section may petition the chancery or circuit court of the county for injunctive relief under this section. The court in which the petition is filed shall conduct a show cause hearing to determine if thumb or other prints obtained pursuant to § 45-6-222 have been used by a law enforcement officer or agency for the purpose of racial profiling.

If the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that a violation of this section has occurred, it shall grant an injunction prohibiting the officer or agency from obtaining thumb or other prints pursuant to § 45-6-222 for the period specified in subsection (c).

If the court finds by a preponderance of evidence that a violation of this section has not occurred, it shall deny the petition for an injunction.

A law enforcement officer or agency who violates this section for the first time shall be enjoined from requesting subpoenas for the production of thumb or other prints pursuant to § 45-6-222 for a period of six (6) months.

A law enforcement officer or agency who violates this section for the second time shall be enjoined from requesting subpoenas for the production of thumb or other prints pursuant to § 45-6-222 for a period of one (1) year.

A law enforcement officer or agency who violates this section for a third or subsequent time shall be permanently enjoined from requesting subpoenas for the production of thumb or other prints pursuant to § 45-6-222.

Acts 2001, ch. 429, § 2.

45-6-224. Notice of requirement for fingerprinting — Failure of pawnbroker to comply.

All pawnshops that are required to take and maintain thumb or other prints pursuant to § 45-6-209(b)(7) shall be required to place a sign at least ten inches by fourteen inches (10" X 14") in a prominent location reasonably close in proximity to the place where the pawn transaction will occur. The sign shall contain language in bold type substantially similar to the following:

WARNING! IF YOU CONDUCT A PAWN TRANSACTION AT THIS ESTABLISHMENT YOU WILL BE REQUIRED TO GIVE A THUMBPRINT BEFORE SUCH TRANSACTION MAY BE COMPLETED AND YOUR THUMBPRINT MAY BE OBTAINED AND USED BY THE POLICE.

Any pawnbroker who fails to comply with this section shall be subject to a civil penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) and noncompliance shall be grounds for the suspension of the pawnbroker's license.

Acts 2001, ch. 429, § 2.